Utah statutes.
76-1-107.   Procedure -- Applicable provisions -- Military codes,
enforcement of court orders, and liability for civil damages not affected.
(1) Except as otherwise provided, the procedure governing the accusation,
prosecution, conviction, and punishment of offenders and offenses is not
regulated by this act but by the code of criminal procedure.
(2)  This code does not affect any power conferred by law upon any court-
martial or other military authority or officer to impose and inflict
punishment upon offenders violating military codes or laws; nor does it affect
any power of a court to punish for contempt or to employ any sanction
authorized by law for the enforcement of an order or a civil judgment or
decree.
(3)  This act does not bar, suspend, or otherwise affect any right or
liability to damages, penalty, forfeiture, impeachment, or other remedy
authorized by law to be recovered or enforced in a civil action,
administrative proceeding, or otherwise, regardless of whether the conduct
involved in the proceeding constitutes an offense defined in this code.
